District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.76

Credit for prior law enforcement service.

In computing length of service of a retiring lateral law enforcement officer hired pursuant to § 1-610.72, credit shall be granted for prior law enforcement service outside the Metropolitan Police Department only if the lateral law enforcement officer has deposited to the credit of the Police Officers’ and Firefighters’ Retirement Fund an amount that is equal to the dollar increase in the present value of future benefits which results from crediting the prior service. The calculation of the present value of future benefits shall be based on the actuarial assumptions and methods used to calculate the present value of future benefits from § 1-907.03(a)(3)(B) for the applicable fiscal year. Upon separation from District law enforcement duty for reasons other than retirement, any law enforcement officer who purchased prior service credit shall receive that purchase amount along with any interest credited on the amount. Any law enforcement officer that withdraws the purchase amount and is later reinstated shall not be entitled to this prior service credit until the purchase amount plus interest is again deposited.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1076
as added Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 102(b), 47 DCR 4619
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
This section is referenced in § 1-610.75.
1981 Ed., § 1-611.76.